Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB947.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of October 30, 1987 (P.L.375, No.75), entitled "An act providing for the designation of certain trees and land on the grounds of the State Capitol in Harrisburg as 'Soldiers' Grove' in honor of war veterans; imposing duties upon the Department of General Services; and making an appropriation," is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.3. Protection of hallowed ground.(a) Prohibition.--A festival, celebration, gathering or demonstration within the area designated as "Soldiers' Grove" is prohibited except if the event is held exclusively for any of the following:(1) Veterans or their families to honor or support 123456789101112131415161718192021 veterans.(2) First responders or their families to honor or support first responders.(b) Prevention of permit licensure.--A government entity may not issue a permit to hold a festival, celebration, gathering or demonstration within the area designated as "Soldiers' Grove."(c) Penalty.--A person who violates subsection (a) commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $2,500 or to imprisonment for not more than one year.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"First responder." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 79C11 (relating to definitions).Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0947PN1068 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516